Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1894.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 602(a), (B) and (c) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended to read:Section 602. LIFE Program.--(a) Informational materials and department correspondence used by the department and the I ndependent Enrollment Broker to educate or notify an eligible individual about long-term care services and supports, including [an] the eligible individual's rights, responsibilities and choice of managed care organization to cover long-term care services and supports, shall include the following:(1) A description of the LIFE program[.], including a list <--<--1234567891011121314151617 of frequently asked questions developed with input from LIFE providers to provide clarification on specific program benefits and requirements . (2) A statement that [an] the eligible individual has the option to enroll in the LIFE program or a managed care organization under the Community Health Choices Program.(3) Contact information for the assigned LIFE [providers.] provider in the eligible individual's area of residence . (4) A comparison of the services provided by the Community Health Choices Program and by the LIFE program.(5) An attestation form to be signed by the eligible individual indicating the eligible individual's understanding of the services offered by the LIFE program. The department shall engage LIFE providers in developing the language and content of the attestation form under this paragraph.* * *(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTINUE TO PROVIDE TRAINING TO THE INDEPENDENT ENROLLMENT BROKER ON THE LIFE PROGRAM THROUGH THE INDEPENDENT ENROLLMENT BROKER LIFE MODULE TO BETTER EDUCATE THE INDEPENDENT ENROLLMENT BROKER AND TO REQUIRE THAT THE LIFE PROGRAM IS OFFERED EQUALLY TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS.(c) At the end of each quarter, the department shall issue a report [that tracks by county the enrollment of eligible individuals in long-term care service programs, including managed care organizations and LIFE programs.] to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives that tracks, by county, the enrollment of eligible individuals in long-term care service programs by 20250HB1894PN2550 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Independent Enrollment Broker, including managed care organizations and LIFE programs. The report shall include documentation of compliance with subsections (a) and (b).* * *SECTION 2. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 602(A), (B) AND (C) OF THE ACT.(2) SECTION 1604-T OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.434, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE, IS REPEALED.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1894PN2550 - 3 - <--<--1234567891011